Nevada, session 83, SB270.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Upon written request of a Taft-Hartley
multiemployer pension trust fund formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. §
186(c)(5) or a joint labor-management committee established
pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 175a, each contractor and subcontractor
shall make available for inspection the following documents
relating to a public work or other project paid for in whole or in
part by public money:
(a) The bid on the contract and any documents submitted as
part of the bidding process on the public work or project paid for
in whole or in part by public money;
(b) Any executed contract or subcontract relating to the public
work or project paid for in whole or in part by public money; and
-
*SB270*

– 3 –
(c) Any record of work performed on the public work or other
project paid for in whole or in part by public money, including,
without limitation, payroll records.
2. If a contractor or subcontractor fails to make any
document requested pursuant to subsection 1 available for
inspection within 10 days after receipt of a written request, the
requesting party may file a complaint with the Labor
Commissioner. Upon review of such a complaint, the Labor
Commissioner may, except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
impose an administrative penalty of $100 upon the noncompliant
contractor or subcontractor for each day the document is not
made available for inspection.
3. Each contractor and subcontractor shall, before making
any record available for inspection pursuant to subsection 1,
redact any personal identifying information, including, without
limitation, social security numbers and dates of birth.
4. A contractor must not be subject to a penalty imposed
pursuant to subsection 2 for failure to produce any document
requested that is in the possession or control of a subcontractor.
5. For the purposes of this section, it shall be deemed that a
project is a project paid for in whole or in part by public money if:
(a) A public body pays money or other compensation directly
to or on behalf of the developer or contractor of the project or any
subcontractor who performs any work on the project;
(b) A public body pays, credits, reduces, forgives or waives any
fee, cost, rent, insurance premium, bond premium, obligation or
expense in relation to the project that is normally required in the
execution of a contract for a public work;
(c) A public body loans money in relation to the project that is
required to be repaid to the public body on a contingent basis; or
(d) In relation to the project, a public body transfers the
project for less than fair market value.
Sec. 3. 1. A representative of a joint labor-management
committee established pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 175a must be given
reasonable access to a public work to monitor compliance with the
provisions of NRS 338.01165 and 338.020 to 338.090, inclusive.
2. A public body, contractor or subcontractor on a public
work shall not be liable for any violation of any occupational
safety and health standard as a result of the monitoring of a public
work by a representative of a joint labor-management committee
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Any injury sustained by a representative of a joint labor-
management committee while monitoring a public work pursuant
to subsection 1 is subject to the workers’ compensation or liability
insurance policy of the joint labor-management committee and is
-
*SB270*

– 4 –
not a liability of the public body or any contractor or
subcontractor on the public work.
4. A joint labor-management committee may bring a cause of
action in a court of competent jurisdiction against a public body,
contractor or subcontractor who denies a representative of a joint
labor-management committee reasonable access to a public work
pursuant to subsection 1. An action brought pursuant to this
subsection must be brought within 6 months after the date the
representative was denied reasonable access. If the joint labor-
management committee is the prevailing party in an action
brought pursuant to this subsection, the court shall award the
joint labor-management committee:
(a) One thousand dollars for each occasion reasonable access
was denied; and
(b) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
5. As used in this section, “reasonable access” means access
during reasonable working hours that does not disrupt the
performance of any work on a public work and does not violate
any occupational safety and health standards.
H
-
*SB270*